Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 2

Fire Extinguishers and Related Equipment

62-32-201. Purpose of part.

The purpose of this part is to regulate the leasing, selling and servicing of portable fire extinguishers and the installing and servicing of fixed fire extinguisher systems (nonwater) in the interest of safeguarding lives and property.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Fire protection sprinkler systems, title 62, chapter 32, part 1.

Smoke alarms, in dwellings and residential buildings, §§ 68-120-111, 68-120-112.

62-32-202. Administration of part — Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The commissioner of commerce and insurance shall administer this part and may promulgate rules and regulations that the commissioner considers necessary. The commissioner, in adopting necessary rules and regulations, may use recognized standards such as, but not limited to, those of the National Fire Protection Association, those recognized by federal law or regulation, those published by any nationally recognized standards-making organization or those in the manufacturer's installation manuals. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 3.

62-32-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce and insurance;

“Department” means the department of commerce and insurance;

“Division” means the division of fire prevention;

“Extinguisher specialist” means an individual who is or is designated to be in active and responsible charge of the work of installing or servicing portable fire extinguishers or installing or servicing fixed fire extinguisher systems;

“Extinguisher technician” means an individual who may perform the work of installing or servicing portable fire extinguishers or installing or servicing fixed fire extinguisher systems and who services portable extinguishers or fixed systems only under direct supervision of a licensed extinguisher specialist;

“Firm” means any person, partnership, corporation or association offering service and servicing of portable fire extinguishers or fixed fire extinguisher systems, including installation;

“Fixed fire extinguisher system” means a device mounted to a permanent structure and containing powder, liquid or gases that can be expelled under pressure for the purpose of suppressing or extinguishing a fire;

“Hydrostatic testing” means pressure testing by hydrostatic methods;

“Portable fire extinguisher” means a portable device containing powder, liquid or gases that can be expelled under pressure for the purpose of suppressing or extinguishing a fire; and

“Service and servicing” means servicing portable fire extinguishers or fixed fire extinguisher systems by charging, filling, maintaining, recharging, refilling, repairing or testing.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 4.

62-32-204. Certificates, licenses and permits — Fees.

Each firm engaged in the business of installing or servicing portable fire extinguishers or installing or servicing fixed fire extinguisher systems must have a certificate of registration issued by the commissioner.

The initial fee for the certificate of registration must be in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) and the renewal fee for each year thereafter must be in an amount not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

A nonrefundable application fee, in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100), shall accompany the initial application.

Each separate office location of a firm engaged in the business of installing or servicing portable fire extinguishers or installing or servicing fixed extinguisher systems, other than the location identified on the certificate of registration, must have a branch office registration certificate issued by the board. The initial fee for a branch office registration certificate must be in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100), and the renewal fee for each year thereafter must be in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100). The division shall identify each branch office location as a part of a registered firm before a branch office registration certificate may be issued.

A nonrefundable application fee for branch offices, in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100), shall accompany the initial application.

No firm shall perform hydrostatic testing of fire extinguishers without a valid authorization to do such work from the department. Authorization shall be noted on the firm's certificate of registration. The initial authorization fee must be in an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) and the renewal fee for each year thereafter must be in an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Each extinguisher specialist of firms engaged in the business of installing or servicing portable fire extinguishers or installing or servicing fixed fire extinguisher systems who services extinguishers or fixed systems must have a license issued by the department.

The department shall issue a license to only qualified extinguisher specialists. A manufacturer's examination approved by the department shall be used as a basis to determine the qualification for each extinguisher specialist and for each extinguisher technician.

An application for a license as an extinguisher specialist shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the department.

The application shall be accompanied by:

A nonrefundable application fee, in an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00), for initial applications;

Proof of qualification from a manufacturer test and school;

The initial license fee in an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00); or

A license renewal fee in an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

Each person servicing portable fire extinguishers or fixed fire extinguisher systems as an extinguisher technician shall, before servicing any portable fire extinguisher or servicing any fixed fire extinguisher system, apply to the commissioner for an extinguisher technician permit. The fee for the extinguisher technician permit must be in an amount not to exceed thirty dollars ($30.00). An extinguisher technician may perform the services only under direct supervision of a person holding a valid license under this part who works for the same firm as the extinguisher specialist. An extinguisher technician permit is valid for one (1) year from the date of issuance.

Each firm must have one (1) employee who is a qualified licensed extinguisher specialist and each branch office must have one (1) employee who is a qualified licensed extinguisher specialist, and each qualified licensed extinguisher specialist will have no more than three (3) extinguisher technicians.

A fee in an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be charged for a duplicate certificate of registration, license or extinguisher technician permit issued under this part or for any request requiring changes to a certificate of registration, license or permit. A new certificate of registration with a new number shall be issued to a registered firm on a change of ownership for a fee in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). A fee in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) shall be charged for a change of ownership of a branch office.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 5.

62-32-205. Label of approval — Certificates and licenses must be current — Employees — Transferability of certificates, licenses and permits.

No portable fire extinguisher or fixed fire extinguisher system may be leased, sold or installed in this state unless it carries a label of approval of a testing laboratory approved by the department.

Except as provided in § 62-32-206, only the holder of a current and valid certificate of registration or an extinguisher specialist license issued pursuant to this part may service portable fire extinguishers or install or maintain fixed fire extinguisher systems.

A person who has been issued a license pursuant to this part to service portable fire extinguishers or install and service fixed fire extinguisher systems must be an employee, agent or servant of a firm that holds a certificate of registration issued pursuant to this part.

A certificate of registration, license or permit issued under this part is not transferable.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 6.

62-32-206. Exemptions.

This part does not apply to:

The filling or charging of a portable fire extinguisher by the manufacturer prior to its initial sale;

The servicing by a firm of its own portable fire extinguishers or fixed systems, or both, by its own personnel specially trained for such servicing;

The sale, installation, maintenance or service of a fire protection sprinkler system by a fire protection sprinkler contractor registered pursuant to part 1 of this chapter;

Firms engaged in the retailing or wholesaling of portable fire extinguishers as defined in § 62-32-203, but not engaged in the installation or recharging of them; or

Fire departments recharging portable fire extinguishers as a public service where no charge is made; provided, that members of the fire department performing such a public service shall be trained in the proper filling and recharging of the fire extinguishers.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 7.

62-32-207. Prohibited practices.

No person may:

Engage in the business of servicing portable fire extinguishers without a current certificate of registration;

Engage in the business of installing or servicing fixed fire extinguisher systems without a current certificate of registration;

Service portable fire extinguishers or service or install fixed fire extinguisher systems without a current license;

Perform hydrostatic testing of portable fire extinguishers without a valid authorization to do such work;

Obtain or attempt to obtain a certificate of registration or license by fraudulent representation;

Service portable fire extinguishers or service or install fixed fire extinguisher systems contrary to this part or the rules and regulations formulated and administered under the authority of this part;

Service or perform hydrostatic testing of a fire extinguisher that does not have a label of approval of a testing laboratory approved by the department;

Sell, service or recharge a carbon tetrachloride fire extinguisher; or

Sell, rent or lease a portable fire extinguisher that has not been approved as provided by § 62-32-205(a).

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 8.

62-32-208. Violations — Nonissuance, nonrenewal, suspension or revocation of certificates, licenses or permits.

The commissioner may refuse to issue, renew, suspend, or revoke a certificate of registration, license, or permit, if the commissioner finds that the applicant, registrant, licensee, or permit holder has violated this part or any rule lawfully promulgated under this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 9; 2015, ch. 381, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 381, § 7 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to violations occurring on or after May 8, 2015.

62-32-209. Applicability of administrative procedures.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters concerning the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 10.

62-32-210. Certificates, licenses and permits — Application and reapplication — Renewal — Reexamination where license revoked — Continuing education.

Applications and qualifications for licenses, permits and certificates issued under this part shall be made pursuant to regulations adopted by the commissioner.

An applicant, registrant, licensee or permit holder whose certificate of registration, license or permit has been refused or revoked under this part may not file another application for a certificate of registration, license or permit within one (1) year from the effective date of the refusal or revocation. After one (1) year from that date, the applicant may reapply and show good cause why the issuance of the applicant's certificate of registration, license or permit is not against the public safety and welfare.

A person whose license to service portable fire extinguishers or to install or service fixed fire extinguisher systems has been revoked must retake and pass the required written examination by the manufacturer before a new license may be issued.

An unexpired license or registration may be renewed by paying the required renewal fee to the department before the expiration date of the license or registration. If a license or registration has been expired for no longer than ninety (90) days, the license or registration may be renewed by paying to the division the required renewal fee and a fee that is one half (½) of the original fee for the license or registration. If a license or registration has been expired for longer than ninety (90) days but less than two (2) years, the license or registration may be renewed by paying the division all unpaid renewal fees and a fee that is equal to the original fee for the license or registration. If a license or registration has been expired for two (2) years or longer, the license or registration may not be renewed. A new license or certificate of registration may be obtained by complying with the requirements and procedures for obtaining an original license or registration. At least thirty (30) days before the expiration of a license or registration, the division shall send written notice of the impending license or registration expiration to the licensee or registrant at the licensee's or registrant's last known address. This subsection (d) may not be construed to prevent the board from denying or refusing to renew a license under applicable law or rules of the department.

The commissioner may promulgate rules under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the certifying of continuing education programs for persons licensed under this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 11.

62-32-211. Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner shall:

Formulate and administer rules and regulations as may be determined essentially necessary for the protection and preservation of life and property, in controlling the:

Registration of firms engaging in the business of servicing portable fire extinguishers or installing and maintaining fixed fire extinguisher systems;

Registration of firms engaging in the business of hydrostatic testing of portable fire extinguishers;

Examining of applications of persons applying for a license to service portable fire extinguishers for proper qualification;

Licensing of persons to service portable fire extinguishers and install fixed fire extinguisher systems; and

Requirements for the servicing of portable fire extinguishers and the maintenance of fixed fire extinguisher systems;

Evaluate the qualifications of firms or individuals for a certificate of registration to engage in the business of servicing portable fire extinguishers or installing fixed fire extinguisher systems;

Issue certificates of registration for those firms that qualify under the rules and regulations to engage in the business of servicing portable fire extinguishers or installing and servicing fixed fire extinguisher systems and issue licenses, extinguisher technician permits and authorizations to perform hydrostatic testing to the firms or individuals who qualify; and

Evaluate the qualifications of firms seeking approval as testing laboratories for portable fire extinguishers and fixed fire extinguisher systems.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 12.

62-32-212. Fees constitute expendable receipts.

All fees collected under this part constitute expendable receipts of the department for use in administering this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 13.

62-32-213. Applicability of provisions — State preemption of regulatory field.

This part and the rules promulgated under this part shall have uniform force and effect throughout the state. No political subdivision of this state may adopt and enforce any order, ordinance, rule or regulation requiring any person to obtain any form of permission from the political subdivision to act as a fire extinguisher firm. A political subdivision may require a fire extinguisher system contractor to pay for and obtain a permit for the installation of fire extinguisher systems and require the installation to conform with applicable building codes and requirements; however, the political subdivision may not impose on fire extinguisher system firms qualification or financial responsibility requirements other than proof of a valid certificate of registration issued under this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 14.

62-32-214. Surety bond — Alternatives to bond.

A surety bond shall be executed by the applicant and a surety company authorized to do business in this state, made payable to the state of Tennessee in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The bond shall be for the use and benefit of any person who may be injured or aggrieved by a wrongful act or omission of any employee, servant, officer or agent in the conduct of business of the fire extinguisher system firm. Any person so injured or aggrieved may sue directly on the bond without assignment of the bond.

The bond shall be in effect at all times and places in which the fire extinguisher system firm engages in business in this state. If the bond ceases to be in effect, the certificate of registration of the firm shall become invalid.

The aggregate liability of the surety shall not exceed the amount of the bond.

The bonding requirement of this section does not apply to any person who is licensed to engage in fire protection sprinkler system work by the board for licensing contractors under chapter 6 of this title.

In lieu of the surety bond required by this section, the applicant may deposit with the division:

A federally insured certificate of deposit issued by any financial institution in this state in an amount no less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

An irrevocable letter of credit issued by any federally insured bank or savings and loan association in an amount no less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000); or

A written proof of liability insurance coverage provided by a single-limit policy with a limit of no less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for bodily injury and for damage to property in any one (1) accident. The policy shall be for the use and benefit of any person who may be injured or aggrieved by a wrongful act or omission of any employee, servant, officer or agent in the conduct of business of the fire extinguisher system firm.

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 15; Acts 1987, ch. 371, §§ 1, 2.

62-32-215. Penalty.

Any person violating this part or any rule lawfully promulgated under this part commits a Class A misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

In addition to the penalty set forth in subsection (a):

The commissioner shall, upon receipt of the first violation, send a written notice of violation which shall include the possible actions that may be taken in response to any second or subsequent violation;

The commissioner may issue the following civil penalties for second or subsequent violations of this part or the rules lawfully promulgated under this part:

For a second violation, a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100);

For a third violation, a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500); and

For a fourth or subsequent violation, a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Acts 1986, ch. 721, § 16; 2015, ch. 381, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor penalty provisions of this section may be affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Acts 2015, ch. 381, § 7 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to violations occurring on or after May 8, 2015.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.